Utah statutes.
63M-1-1003.   Preemption of local regulation.

(1)  A county, city, town, or other political subdivision may not regulate the technological processes relating to the development and use of biotechnologically created materials and organisms.

(2)  This preemption does not affect the powers of a county, city, town, or other political subdivision, including the power to regulate land use, business, industry, construction, and public utilities, to protect the public health or environment, or to provide fire protection and other public safety services.

